Delaware, session 153, SB189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2322, Title 18 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2322 Release of claim or settlement agreement by injured persons in automobile accidents (a) A release of a claim of an individual for injuries resulting from an automobile accident, signed by the individual within 30 days of the infliction of the injuries without the assistance or guidance of an attorney at law, and without any power of attorney to or contract of employment with an attorney at law, with reference to recovery of damages resulting from the accident, may be rescinded by the injured individual within 60 days after the date on which the individual signed the document, or, if no release is signed, within 60 days from the cashing of a settlement check or transfer of electronic funds. (b) For a recission under subsection (a) of this section to be effective, all of the following must be satisfied: (1) The notice of rescission must be in writing to the releasee, or to the releaseeâs legal representative or insurance carrier. (2) The injured individual must return to the releasee or releaseeâs legal representative or insurance carrier any check or settlement proceeds received by the injured individual. (3) The items required by paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2) of this section must be sent to the releasee or releaseeâs legal representative or insurance carrier no later than 10 days after the expiration of the 60-day rescission period. (c) A release of liability executed within 30 days of the incident giving rise to the claim for personal injury must contain a notice of the individualâs right to rescind the release, stated conspicuously and separately on the release or settlement check. If no release or settlement check exists, the required language must be provided to individual via written communication. Section 2. This Act takes effect 6 months after its enactment into law.